District of Columbia statutes.
40-303.20

Judgment for deficiency upon sale.

In any suit brought to enforce a lien by virtue of the provisions aforesaid, if the proceeds of the property affected thereby shall be insufficient to satisfy such lien, a personal judgment for the deficiency may be given in favor of the lien or against the owner of the premises or the original contractor, as the case may be, whichever contracted with him for the labor or materials furnished by him, provided such person be a party to the suit and shall have been personally served with process therein.

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1388, ch. 854, § 1258
1981 Ed., § 38-122.
1973 Ed., § 38-122.